Utah statutes.
30-1-33.   Conformity to master plan for counseling as prerequisite to marriage license -- Exceptions.

Whenever the board of commissioners of a county has adopted a master plan for premarital counseling no resident of the county may obtain a marriage license without conforming to the plan, except that:

(1)  Any person who applies for a marriage license shall have the right to secure the license and to marry notwithstanding their failure to conform to the required premarital counseling or their failure to obtain a certificate of authorization from the premarital counseling board if they wait six months from the date of application for issuance of the license.

(2)  This chapter does not apply to any application for a marriage license where both parties are at least 19 years of age and neither has been previously divorced.

(3)  This chapter does not apply to any application for a marriage license unless both applicants have physically resided in Utah for 60 days immediately preceding their application.

(4)  Premarital counseling required by this act shall be considered fulfilled if the applicants present a certificate verified by a clergyman that the applicants have completed a course of premarital counseling approved by a church and given by or under the supervision of the clergyman.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

